California, session 20252026, AB320.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1090.1 is added to the Education Code, to read:1090.1. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, and to the extent permitted by federal law, any compensation awarded to a pupil member pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1090 shall not be considered as income or resources when determining eligibility and benefit amount for any means-tested program, including, but not limited to, CalWORKs, General Assistance, Medi-Cal, and Cash Assistance Program for Immigrants (CAPI), and any scholarships for public colleges and universities, including, but not limited to, Cal Grant awards, Chafee grant awards, Middle Class Scholarship Program awards, California College Promise Grants, California State University Educational Opportunity Program (EOP) grants, Community College Extended Opportunity Programs and Services (EOPS) grants, and grants from the University of California or the California State University.(b) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the State Department of Social Services may implement, interpret, or make specific this section for programs under its jurisdiction by means of all-county letters or similar written instructions from the department until regulations are adopted. These all-county letters or similar instructions shall have the same force and effect as regulations until the adoption of regulations.(c) This section shall apply to programs under the jurisdiction of the State Department of Social Services beginning on the date that the State Department of Social Services notifies the Legislature that the California Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this section for those programs. The department shall issue guidance as necessary to begin automation no later than July 1, 2026.SEC. 2. Section 35120.1 is added to the Education Code, to read:35120.1. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, and to the extent permitted by federal law, any compensation awarded to a pupil member pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 35120 shall not be considered as income or resources when determining eligibility and benefit amount for any means-tested program, including, but not limited to, CalWORKs, General Assistance, Medi-Cal, and Cash Assistance Program for Immigrants (CAPI), and any scholarships for public colleges and universities, including, but not limited to, Cal Grant awards, Chafee grant awards, Middle Class Scholarship Program awards, California College Promise Grants, California State University Educational Opportunity Program (EOP) grants, Community College Extended Opportunity Programs and Services (EOPS) grants, and grants from the University of California or the California State University.(b) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the State Department of Social Services may implement, interpret, or make specific this section for programs under its jurisdiction by means of all-county letters or similar written instructions from the department until regulations are adopted. These all-county letters or similar instructions shall have the same force and effect as regulations until the adoption of regulations.(c) This section shall apply to programs under the jurisdiction of the State Department of Social Services beginning on the date that the State Department of Social Services notifies the Legislature that the California Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this section for those programs. The department shall issue guidance as necessary to begin automation no later than July 1, 2026.SEC. 3. Section 11157.3 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:11157.3. (a) For purposes of this chapter and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200), notwithstanding any other law and to the extent permitted by federal law, any compensation awarded to a pupil member of a governing board of a school district pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 35120 of the Education Code shall be exempt from consideration as income and resources. (b) For purposes of this chapter and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200), notwithstanding any other law and to the extent permitted by federal law, any compensation awarded to a pupil member of a county board of education pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1090 of the Education Code shall be exempt from consideration as income and resources.(c) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the State Department of Social Services may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters or similar written instructions from the department until regulations are adopted. These all-county letters or similar instructions shall have the same force and effect as regulations until the adoption of regulations.(d) This section shall become operative on the date the State Department of Social Services notifies the Legislature that the California Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this section. The department shall issue guidance as necessary to begin automation no later than July 1, 2026.SEC. 4. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.